Washington statutes.
RCW 9.45.210

Altering sample or certificate of assay.

Any person who shall interfere with or in any manner change samples of ores or bullion produced for sampling, or change or alter samples or packages of ores or bullion which have been purchased for assaying, or who shall change or alter any certificate of sampling or assaying, with intent to cheat, wrong or defraud, is guilty of a class C felony, punishable by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not less than one year nor more than five years, or by a fine of not less than fifty nor more than one thousand dollars, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

[ 2003 c 53 s 32; 1890 p 99 s 2; RRS s 2712.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.